New York, session 2025-2026, A6229.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1117 of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (m) to read as follows: 3 (m) No policy of insurance covering long term care issued subject to 4 the provisions of this section shall provide any type of coverage to an 5 insured which the insured already has in force and effect at the time of 6 execution of such a policy covering long term care. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08967-01-5